Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 10. Right of accused to defend.

In all criminal prosecutions the accused shall have the right to defend in person
and by counsel, to demand the nature and cause of the accusation,
to have a copy thereof, to be confronted with the witnesses against
him, to have compulsory process served for obtaining witnesses, and
to a speedy trial by an impartial jury of the county or district
in
which the offense is alleged to have been committed. When the
location
of the offense cannot be established with certainty, venue
may be
placed in the county or district where the corpus delecti
[delicti]
is found, or in any county or district in which the victim
was transported.
(As amended by Laws 1975, Senate Joint Resolution
No. 2, p. 474.)

Cross references. —

As to change of venue in criminal cases, see §

1-7-102

and references thereunder.

As to effect of delay in bringing accused to trial, see §

7-11-203

.

As to assignment of counsel, see Rule 44, W.R. Cr. P.

As to subpoena of witnesses, see Rule 17, W.R. Cr. P.

As to place of prosecution or trial, see Rule 18, W.R. Cr. P.

As to presence of defendant during proceedings, see Rule 43, W.R. Cr. P.

Defendant not denied right to effectively cross-examine child victim.—

Defendant was not denied his right to effectively cross-examine the child victim and any error was harmless; the victim provided verbal responses to most questions and her motive in not answering some questions might have been due to a lack of memory or a misunderstanding as opposed to a refusal to answer. Defense counsel’s cessation of questioning appeared to have been strategic and even assuming defendant would have been able to discredit the victim, the verdict would not have been different because her testimony was not the only evidence of guilt. Tamblyn v. State, 2020 WY 76, 465 P.3d 440,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2020).

Defendant's opportunity to confront witnesses not denied. —

Because the victim and forensic examiner were under subpoena requiring them to testify at trial, but defendant did not call them to testify, he was not denied an opportunity to confront those witnesses, and the amendment to the felony information, without a continuance, had no effect on his defense, and did not violate the Confrontation Clause. LaJeunesse v. State, 2020 WY 29, 458 P.3d 1213,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2020).

Defendant had effective counsel.

—

Trial counsel was not ineffective because excessive cross-examination carried risk, it could have allowed the witness to walk back statements favorable to the defense, elicited unfavorable testimony, or inadvertently enhanced the witness’s or the victim’s credibility; the fact that trial counsel could have pursued a different strategy by continuing to press a witness on her pretrial statements did not prove counsel’s assistance ineffective. Shields v. State, 2020 WY 101, 468 P.3d 1097,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2020).

Trial counsel demonstrated the legal knowledge, skill, thoroughness and preparation reasonably necessary to represent defendant because there was no requirement that defense attorneys in cases involving charges of sexual abuse of a minor to have specialized training and experience; defendant indicated her desire to continue with lead counsel. Shields v. State, 2020 WY 101, 468 P.3d 1097,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2020).

Trial counsel did not perform deficiently with respect to their pretrial investigation, and no prejudice showing had been made, because defendant did not identify how trial counsels’ further review of and familiarity with the materials they received from the State before trial would have benefited the defense or otherwise affected the trial outcome. Shields v. State, 2020 WY 101, 468 P.3d 1097,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2020).

Defendant failed to show that had trial counsel raised a pre-trial taint argument, it would have prevented the minor victim from testifying or that by presenting the taint evidence only at trial her chances of acquittal were lessened because there was no evidence that a reasonably competent attorney would have requested a separate taint hearing; to the extent the defense advanced a peripheral taint argument at trial, trial counsel implemented sufficient safeguards through cross-examination. Shields v. State, 2020 WY 101, 468 P.3d 1097,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2020).

Defendant's right to a fair trial.—

Appellant’s right to a fair trial was not denied when the district court refused to individually query jurors about pretrial publicity where all of the jurors who had seen the two articles at issue averred that they could decide the case based on the evidence at trial and the court’s instructions. Pickering v. State, 2020 WY 66, 464 P.3d 236,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2020).

Defendant had effective counsel.—

Appellant’s arguments that defense counsel lacked time to reasonably investigate, they relied on undeveloped defense theories at trial, and they did not interview the officers alleged to be victims were rejected where a lesser included manslaughter jury instruction had been requested, appellant failed to identify what favorable evidence, if any, would have been garnered had the alleged victims been interviewed, and counsel had access to and read the officer and victim statements.
Pickering v. State, 2020 WY 66, 464 P.3d 236,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2020).

Appellant’s arguments that defense counsel was ineffective for failing to retain a mental health expert was rejected where appellant failed to plead not guilty by reason of mental illness, and thus, any expert testimony would not have been admissible.
Pickering v. State, 2020 WY 66, 464 P.3d 236,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2020).

Jury instructions not prejudicial. —

Although the district court erred by failing to define substantial step for the jury and by including the concept of attempt in the elements of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor when instructing the jury, counsel was not ineffective in failing to object to the instructions as defendant was not prejudiced by the failure to object because the evidence against him was overwhelming as defendant’s statements over several weeks confirmed he had the specific intent to inflict sexual intrusion upon the victim and his actions were strongly corroborative of the firmness of his intention to complete the crime of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

This section is similar to U.S. Const., amend. 6.

State v. Yazzie, 67 Wyo. 256, 218 P.2d 482,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1950).

And U.S. supreme court decisions on speedy trials accorded
full credit in questions presented to state supreme court. —

In recognition of the supreme law of the land, the United States supreme court decisions on speedy trials were accorded full credit in deciding the question presented to the state supreme court as to whether there was an unconstitutional delay in bringing defendants to trial. Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976).

Under the following facts, reason and justification for defendant's absence was sufficiently established

and could not be held voluntary, such that continuing the trial in his absence resulted in prejudice: (1) the defendant suffered a heart attack during trial and because of persistent chest pain, there was a risk of a major heart attack or cardiac complications occurring in the future; (2) the defendant was not present to assist and consult with his attorney when instructions on the law were submitted and during closing arguments; and (3) the defendant was not able to consult with or advise his attorney concerning the appropriate means for responding to the jury's inquiry, during deliberations, concerning the applicability of self-defense. Maupin v. State, 694 P.2d 720,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 437

(Wyo. 1985).

Constitutional right to attorney of choice. —

The person accused of the commission of a crime has the constitutional right to be represented by an attorney of his own choice; this is the construction given to the 6th amendment to the constitution of the United States, and the same construction must be given to this section of the constitution of the state of Irvin v. State, 584 P.2d 1068,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1978).

Or to appointed counsel. —

The accused has an absolute right to have counsel appointed if he is unable to employ his own attorney. Irvin v. State, 584 P.2d 1068,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1978).

Lack of counsel never harmless error. —

The assistance of counsel is such a basic right that the lack of such assistance can never be treated as harmless error. The right to have the assistance of counsel is too fundamental and absolute to allow courts to indulge in nice calculations as to the amount of prejudice arising from its denial. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Where the right to counsel has been denied at a critical stage of the proceedings, the denial can never be treated as harmless error, and reversal is automatic. Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997).

Prosecutorial Misconduct. —

Defendant's conviction was reversed because (1) the prosecution pervasively used improper “was she lying” questions to undermine defendant's credibility when that was the central issue, (2) the prosecution did not have a strong case, (3) efforts to cure the prosecution's error were ineffective, and (3) defendant did not invite the error, and counsel timely objected. McGinn v. State, 2015 WY 140, 361 P.3d 295,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2015).

Exercise of right to self-representation. —

When a defendant wants to exercise his right to self-representation: (1) the defendant must be the one to initially request the right; (2) the demand must be timely; and (3) the request must not be used as a delaying tactic. Williams v. State, 655 P.2d 273,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 419

(Wyo. 1982).

When a defendant fails to make a timely request to proceed pro se, the trial court has discretion in deciding whether to allow the defendant the exercise of the right. Williams v. State, 655 P.2d 273,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 419

(Wyo. 1982).

Protective restrictions are imposed on exercise of right of self-representation

because it involves a waiver of the fundamental right to counsel; inherent in these protective restrictions is the fact that a court must assure itself that the defendant is competent to waive counsel. Roose v. State, 753 P.2d 574,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1988).

Counsel's advice to defendant not to testify was reasonable.
—

Defendant did not show that counsel was ineffective where defense counsel's advice to defendant not to testify was reasonable, as was counsel's decision not to call certain witnesses as they would serve no useful purpose; district court properly prohibited the defense investigator from testifying.
Guy v. State, 2008 WY 56, 184 P.3d 687,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2008), reh'g denied,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. June 19, 2008).

Determining whether right to counsel intelligently waived depends
on particular facts. —

The determination of whether there has been an intelligent waiver of the right to counsel must depend, in each case, upon the particular facts and circumstances surrounding that case, including the background, experience and conduct of the accused. Cheatham v. State, 719 P.2d 612,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1986).

Defendant's right to appear pro se does not include absolute prohibition against standby counsel.

Rather, a pro se defendant is entitled to preserve actual control over his case and it is only when, over a defendant's objection, standby counsel's participation effectively interferes with any significant decisions or matters of importance that such a right is eroded. Roose v. State, 753 P.2d 574,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1988).

Defendant has no right to manipulate his right to counsel for purpose of delaying and disrupting trial.

Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

And he may not unreasonably reject counsel appointed

to represent him. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

As no constitutional right to particular attorney. —

The constitutional right to have counsel appointed does not include a right to demand that a particular attorney be appointed by the court, and this rule also pertains in instances in which a defendant asks for the substitution of a particular attorney. Irvin v. State, 584 P.2d 1068,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1978).

And appointment of substitute counsel discretionary. —

While a trial court has the power in its discretion to appoint substitute counsel, its refusal to do so is not error unless an abuse of discretion is shown. A factual showing of good cause for the appointment of substitute counsel is essential to the demonstration of an abuse of discretion, and good cause is to be found in incompetence, commitment to a position or an interest which would conflict with the furnishing of an effective defense to the accused, or other good reason to conclude that appointed counsel is unable to furnish effective assistance. Irvin v. State, 584 P.2d 1068,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1978).

Defendant's right to counsel under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 was not violated when the trial court refused to appoint substitute standby counsel, given that once defendant asserted the right to self-representation, the trial court had no duty to appoint counsel for defendant, and the trial court considered the issue and found that substitution was not warranted. May v. State, 2003 WY 14, 62 P.3d 574,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2003).

When right to representation applicable. —

A criminal defendant is entitled to be represented at all adversary judicial proceedings against him following his arrest and at any custodial interrogation prior to his arrest. Auclair v. State, 660 P.2d 1156,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 909, 104 S. Ct. 265, 78 L. Ed. 2d 249, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 1917 (U.S. 1983).

Counsel is required not just at trial, but at “critical stages” both before and after trial in which the substantial rights of the accused may be affected. Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997).

A request for counsel made prior to the commencement of adversarial criminal proceedings does not invoke the right to counsel under this section. Best v. State, 736 P.2d 739,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1987).

Right to counsel attaches only upon commencement of adversary criminal proceedings.

Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989).

No right to consult attorney before taking chemical test. —

The state constitution did not give the defendant a limited right to consult with an attorney before deciding whether or not to submit to chemical testing for blood alcohol. Mogard v. City of Laramie, 2001 WY 88, 32 P.3d 313,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2001).

Prearrest investigation does not trigger right to counsel.
—

The mere fact that an accused is questioned by police officers during their prearrest investigation does not trigger that person's right to counsel. Brown v. State, 661 P.2d 1024,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1983).

Right to representation does not extend to preindictment line-up stage

of criminal proceedings. Charpentier v. State, 736 P.2d 724,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 437

(Wyo. 1987).

No right to be present at conferences. —

There is no right to be present at the jury instruction conference or the jury question conference; the defendant's presence is not required at conferences that encompass purely legal issues. Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994).

Defendant waived her right to be present at bench conferences involving prospective jurors, where both she and her counsel acquiesced in her absence while defense counsel represented her interests for that part of trial. Campbell v. State, 999 P.2d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2000).

In a defendant's murder case, the defendant's right to be present was not violated, where (1) there was no indication that the defendant's absence from a conference on an objection was anything but voluntary, (2) the absence was for a brief period of time, (3) there was no indication that the defendant possessed any special information on the question that his counsel did not, and (4) there was no indication that the defendant's presence could have altered the judge's decision on the objection in any way. Belden v. State, 2003 WY 89, 73 P.3d 1041,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1165, 124 S. Ct. 1179, 157 L. Ed. 2d 1212, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 898 (U.S. 2004).

Effect of failure to consult counsel prior to arrest. —

Failure to consult with counsel prior to being arrested does not foreclose law enforcement officers from interrogating the defendant after his arrest once they give him a proper statement of his constitutional rights in accordance with

Miranda,

and he has given them a waiver of those rights. Brown v. State, 661 P.2d 1024,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1983).

Failure to provide counsel at preliminary hearing

does not in all cases entitle a defendant to a release or a new trial. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

Waiver of right to appeal defects by not objecting prior to
trial. —

Where defendant argued that he was improperly denied an attorney at his preliminary hearing, defendant waived the right to appeal defects in the preliminary hearing by not objecting prior to trial. Coleman v. State, 2005 WY 69, 115 P.3d 411,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2005).

Right to counsel during probation revocation. —

Although Rule 44(a)(2), W.R.Cr.P., limits the circumstances under which the court is required to appoint counsel in a probation revocation proceeding, a defendant is constitutionally entitled to court-appointed counsel in the specific circumstance when the proceeding includes sentencing. Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997).

Under Wyoming's judicial revocation procedure where the state is represented by a prosecutor and the rules of evidence apply to a portion of the proceedings, the Sixth Amendment requires appointment of counsel for indigent probationers when the indigent probationer is entitled to be represented by an attorney under § 7-6-104(a). An inescapable corollary to such a holding is the invalidation of W.R.Cr.P. 44(a)(2), in the context of judicial revocations. Pearl v. State, 996 P.2d 688,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2000).

Also, no right to presence at probation modification hearing.
—

Defendant's rights under
Wyo. Const. art. I, § 10 were not violated when district court denied his requests to modify terms of his probation or to discharge him from probation without his presence at the hearing;
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-13-304(a) and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 39(b) did not mandate that district court hold a hearing on defendant's motions for modification of his probation, and consequently was not entitled to be present at the gratuitous hearing that was held.
Demillard v. State, 2008 WY 93, 190 P.3d 128,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2008).

Right to be present not violated. —

Defendant's constitutional right to be present was not violated
when a trial court ruled on defendant's motion to correct an illegal
sentence and reduced defendant's sentence because defendant's presence
would have been useless; because defendant had already completed
the
statutory maximum sentence for the crime, it would have made
no possible difference whether the trial court imposed the maximum
sentence or
a lesser sentence.
Osborn v. State, 2012 WY 159, 290 P.3d 1096,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. Jan. 15, 2013).

Defendant's right to counsel was not violated

where defendant appeared in court and answered questions regarding his prior convictions, his age, and his educational background, and was asked about his intention to change his plea to guilty, where prior to making any inquiry as to the defendant's plea, the trial judge clearly informed the defendant of his right to have counsel present before he changed his plea, defendant did not waive that right, and no plea was entered at the proceeding. Duffy v. State, 837 P.2d 1047,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1992).

When duty to provide counsel not discharged. —

A criminal defendant's right to effective counsel is inviolate and the court has a duty to provide such counsel, and this duty is not discharged by an assignment at such a time or under such circumstances as to preclude the giving of effective aid in the preparation and trial of the case.
Adger v. State, 584 P.2d 1056,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1978).

Right to counsel is not dependent upon any request.

It is automatic and may only be withdrawn by an express waiver by the accused. Best v. State, 736 P.2d 739,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1987).

Reimbursement for statutorily authorized court costs. —

The district court could not require a criminal defendant to make reimbursement for the costs of his court-appointed counsel, where the crime which he committed occurred before the effective date of the statute authorizing assessments for such expenses. Schiefer v. State, 774 P.2d 133,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1989).

When joint representation denies effective assistance of counsel.
—

A defendant is denied the fundamental right of effective assistance of counsel when the trial court requires joint representation of defendants over timely objections; prejudice is then presumed and need not be independently shown. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Failure to hire an expert was not evidence of ineffectiveness.
—

In an arson case, counsel was not ineffective in failing to engage the services of an expert witness to counter the testimony of the State's three expert fire investigators where the decision not to call an expert was a tactical one, and defense counsel opted to rely on intense cross-examination of the State's experts, as well as the lack of evidence placing defendant at the scene when the fire occurred. Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2004).

Counsel's performance was not deficient for failing to retain an expert to testify at the competency hearing for the child victim where, even though the expert could have presented evidence that the victim had been diagnosed with ADHD, the district court was aware that the victim had traits consistent with the diagnosis, it was aware from the victim's testimony and behavior at the hearing that she had developmental, intellectual, and behavioral issues, and the evidence of a particular diagnoses would not have changed the competency determination. Griggs v. State, 2016 WY 16, 367 P.3d 1108,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2016).

Failing to object to experts was not grounds for ineffective
assistance of counsel. —

In an arson case, counsel was not ineffective for failing to object to the State's experts where a proper foundation for each was established, the experts were not used to vouch for the credibility of the others, and each rounded-out the testimony of the others. Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2004).

Ineffectiveness related to a motion to withdraw plea. —

There was no violation of Wyo. R. Crim. P. 11 based on an alleged failure to advise defendant of the immigration consequences of pleading to a lesser drug charge; therefore, no evidentiary hearing was required on a motion to withdraw the plea since there was no relief available, and no ineffective assistance of counsel claim was alleged. Valle v. State, 2006 WY 43, 132 P.3d 181,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2006), overruled in part, Ortega-Araiza v. State, 2014 WY 99, 331 P.3d 1189,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2014).

Presumption of prejudice in all instances of multiple representation.
—

Prejudice will be presumed in all instances of multiple representation of criminal defendants and, in the absence of an appropriate waiver, multiple representation will constitute reversible error. Shongutsie v. State, 827 P.2d 361,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1992).

Absent a valid waiver, prejudice is presumed in all instances of multiple representation of criminal defendants; in the absence of an appropriate waiver, multiple representation will constitute reversible error. Kenney v. State, 837 P.2d 664,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1992).

Court must advise defendant where multiple representation.
—

The court must, in each case in which the same attorney represents more than one defendant, separately advise each of those defendants of the right to be represented by an attorney free from any conflict of interest and of the dangers inherent in the multiple representation. Should any defendant decide to forego the representation by the attorney who is representing another defendant, the judge will appoint separate counsel for any defendant who qualifies for state-appointed counsel. On the other hand, if any defendant insists upon being represented by the attorney of his choice and chooses the attorney who is representing another defendant, the judge must obtain from that defendant a request, preferably in writing, to be represented by that attorney and must also obtain a knowing and voluntary waiver of the right to be represented by an attorney free from any conflict of interest. Shongutsie v. State, 827 P.2d 361,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1992).

The trial judge has a duty to apprise the defendant of conflict problems that may develop during any dual representation of interested parties. Kenney v. State, 837 P.2d 664,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1992).

Multiple representation requires waiver and absence of conflict
of interest. —

If the defendant insists on retaining an attorney who is representing another co-defendant, the trial judge must obtain a knowing and voluntary waiver of the right to be represented by an attorney free from any conflict of interest and determine that no real conflict exists. Kenney v. State, 837 P.2d 664,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1992).

Attorney should not have undertaken joint representation

where under the factual circumstances existent between the codefendants, one person likely was the “heavy” as the principal and the other constituted the “follower”; joint representation was sure to disfavor one or the other. Kenney v. State, 837 P.2d 664,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1992).

Defendant's right to a fair trial.—

Defendant was deprived of a fair trial because prosecutorial misconduct occurred when the State of Wyoming failed to comply with the district court’s discovery order and when the prosecutor made improper comments during closing argument and because the district court abused its discretion in requiring defendant to wear a leg restraint at trial without conducting a hearing to evaluate the necessity for the restraint. Black v. State, 2017 WY 135, 405 P.3d 1045,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2017).

Presumption of effective assistance of counsel. —

It takes more than assumption and conjecture to overcome the presumption that defendant's trial counsel's decisions were sound trial strategy, and defendant failed to demonstrate that her trial counsel made errors so serious he could not have been functioning as the counsel guaranteed by the
Cureton v. State, 950 P.2d 544,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1997).

Burden of proof in showing counsel ineffective. —

In order for the assistance that a criminal defendant receives from his counsel to be deemed ineffective, the defendant must prove that: (1) counsel's performance was deficient in that counsel made errors so serious that counsel was not functioning as the “counsel” guaranteed the defendant by this section; and (2) the deficient performance prejudiced the defense by errors so serious as to deprive the defendant of a fair trial. Beintema v. State, 936 P.2d 1221,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1997).

Where defendant asserted that his first appointed counsel's conflict of interest, together with that counsel's pursuit of an insanity defense on defendant's behalf, resulted in ineffective assistance of counsel, but accused failed to show that his counsel's performance was deficient or that the deficient performance prejudiced his defense, because accused did not meet his burden of proof in showing that either of these requisites occurred, his argument of ineffective assistance of counsel was baseless. Roose v. State, 753 P.2d 574,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1988).

Defendant's contention that counsel was ineffective because it failed to enter into evidence expert medical testimony purportedly explaining why test results for cannabinoids were positive was not supported by the record. Miller v. State, 942 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1997).

Determination of ineffective assistance. —

The supreme court examines the conduct of defense counsel in light of all the circumstances in determining whether the identified acts or omissions fall outside the ambit of professionally competent assistance, bearing in mind the function of counsel is to make the adversarial testing process work in every case. Beintema v. State, 936 P.2d 1221,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant had effective counsel. —

Defense counsel's failure to object to testimony of defendant's prior contact with police did not violate defendant's right to effective assistance of counsel, since this was a reasonable decision within wide range of professionally competent assistance, and there was no showing of any prejudice caused by the testimony; moreover, defendant used his prior contact with same officers to impeach their credibility. Denmon v. State, 989 P.2d 631,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1999).

See State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985); Campbell v. State, 728 P.2d 628,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 640

(Wyo. 1986); Beintema v. State, 936 P.2d 1221,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant's right to counsel under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 was not violated when a public defender other than the one appointed to represent defendant appeared on a hearing on defendant's motion to proceed pro se; defendant's claim of ineffective assistance of counsel was without merit because defendant made no showing an actual conflict of interest as contended, nor did defendant show prejudice. May v. State, 2003 WY 14, 62 P.3d 574,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2003).

In a murder and robbery case, defendant was not denied effective assistance of counsel. Given defendant's plea of not guilty by reason of mental illness, defense counsel had no choice but to present the alternative theories consistent with his client's alternate pleas; counsel did not fail to subject the prosecution's case to meaningful adversarial testing; and counsel's misstatement during closing argument did not fall below standards of reasonable competency. Sincock v. State, 2003 WY 115, 76 P.3d 323,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2003).

In a murder case, defendant failed to sustain his burden of proving that he was deprived of his constitutional right to the effective assistance of counsel because counsel (1) failed to object to the joinder of the charges for trial; (2) failed to object to hearsay testimony and unduly prejudicial evidence; (3) failed to adequately investigate; (4) failed to object to leading questions; (5) failed to object to the district court's erroneous application of W.R.E. 613; (6) failed to make a record objection to the security measures employed at trial; (7) failed to object to the use of, and the jury's reliance upon, a demonstrative exhibit that was never introduced into evidence; (8) failed to object to the jury being advised it was a non-capital case; and (9) failed to offer any defense instructions, particularly theory-of-defense instructions. On the contrary, defense counsel vigorously represented his client and challenged the prosecution's evidence, and defendant did not demonstrate that counsel's performance was outside the range of professionally competent assistance, nor did he show that the outcome of his trial would have been different absent attorney error. Duke v. State, 2004 WY 120, 99 P.3d 928,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1062, 125 S. Ct. 2513, 161 L. Ed. 2d 1113, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 4397 (U.S. 2005).

Counsel were not ineffective at a suppression hearing regarding the voluntariness of defendant's statements due to intoxication where it was apparent from a transcript of the interview that he was responsive and gave coherent, detailed answers to the detective's questions and that he was able to converse with the detective. Siler v. State, 2005 WY 73, 115 P.3d 14,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2005).

Counsel was not ineffective for failing to file a motion to suppress defendant's statements to officers because defendant did not demonstrate that a suppression motion based on the alleged Miranda violation would have been granted as it did not appear that defendant was subjected to express questioning, or its functional equivalent, prior to being advised of his Miranda rights. After he was arrested, an officer located defendant in a patrol vehicle and read him his Miranda rights, and defendant indicated that he understood his rights and that he wanted to waive those rights and make a statement. Grissom v. State, 2005 WY 132, 121 P.3d 127,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2005).

Counsel was not ineffective for allegedly failing to conduct an adequate investigation into his defense that he was lawfully in possession of certain items because counsel denied that defendant had told them that there were specific emails memorializing an agreement with his employer about the items. There was no evidence in the record other than defendant's uncorroborated assertions to suggest that such emails ever existed.
Barker v. State, 2006 WY 104, 141 P.3d 106,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2006).

Counsel was not ineffective for failing to make an adequate record of defendant's diabetic condition, because defendant did not specifically identify what steps he believed counsel should have taken or effectively explain how making a better record of his condition would have benefited him. Barker v. State, 2006 WY 104, 141 P.3d 106,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2006).

Defendant was not deprived of effective assistance of counsel when a trial court limited the length of closing arguments, which the trial court had the discretion to do in defendant's murder trial.
Sanchez v. State, 2006 WY 116, 142 P.3d 1134,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2006).

In a hearing on remand, although the trial court considered and rejected defendant's ineffective assistance of counsel claim, despite the availability of the evidence from the remand hearing, despite bearing the burden of proof, and in the face of the standard of review for an ineffective assistance of counsel claim and the trial court's detailed decision letter, defendant presented to the supreme court only two and one-half pages of very generalized argument supporting his allegations of ineffective assistance of counsel; in effect, defendant's brief was nothing more than a recitation of the allegations themselves, with no analysis of either the allegedly deficient conduct, or any prejudice that might have resulted therefrom, and thus his ineffective assistance of counsel claim was denied.
Rion v. State, 2007 WY 197, 172 P.3d 734,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 2007).

Counsel was not ineffective in relation to defendant's guilty plea to sexual assault because the evidence against him was fairly substantial, even without his confession, and defendant obtained a substantial benefit by accepting the plea agreement whereby 35 serious felony charges were dropped.
Palmer v. State, 2008 WY 7, 174 P.3d 1298,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2008).

Counsel's performance was not deficient for failing to have its expert testify at trial concerning the child victims' testimony where the expert's observations were not tangibly different from evidence developed by counsel through cross-examination of the State's witnesses, which he formulated with the expert's assistance. Griggs v. State, 2016 WY 16, 367 P.3d 1108,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2016).

Supreme Court found that defendant failed to demonstrate trial counsel provided ineffective assistance by her failure to adequately advance the defense theory of the case. Bruckner v. State, 2018 WY 51, 417 P.3d 178,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2018).

Supreme Court found that trial counsel’s tactical decision in not objecting to admission of defendant’s videotaped statements could not be considered deficient performance. Bruckner v. State, 2018 WY 51, 417 P.3d 178,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2018).

Defendant’s claim of ineffective assistance of counsel failed because defendant failed to overcome the presumption that trial counsel exercised reasonable judgment in making the tactical choice to ask the court to join the charges for trial. Neidlinger v. State, 2021 WY 39, 482 P.3d 337,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2021).

District court did not err in denying the motion asserting defendant’s trial attorney provided ineffective assistance of counsel when he failed to raise a challenge under Batson as the prosecutor testified that he struck Juror #116 because he did not have a spouse or children, did not have a job that interacts with people, and had recently changed jobs, and he or a family member had been a complainant, defendant, or witness in a criminal case; and the State’s reasons for utilizing a peremptory challenge on Juror # 116 were neutral and non-discriminatory. Yazzie v. State, 2021 WY 72, 487 P.3d 555,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2021).

Ineffective assistance for failure to investigate witnesses.
—

Defendant's contentions that his counsel failed to investigate and present witnesses which may have countered state's evidence were sufficiently substantial to warrant reversal and remand to the trial court for a hearing to be held regarding those contentions. Calene v. State, 846 P.2d 679,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1993).

State's case depended entirely on the officer's testimony about what the officer saw during the traffic stop; because defendant's attorney made no effort to to cross-examine the officer at all as to what the officer saw and did not reasonably investigate what the officer could have seen, defendant's attorney was ineffective and defendant's conviction for possession of a felony amount of methamphetamine, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-7-1031

, was reversed. Asch v. State, 2003 WY 18, 62 P.3d 945,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2003).

Counsel ineffective for failing to investigate defendant's
mental history. —
